nursery/apertium-nld-fry/apertium-nld-fry.fry.dix
    <pardef n="s/jen__vblex">
      <e><p><l>jen</l><r>jen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jen</l><r>jen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>joen</l><r>jen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jend</l><r>jen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>jende</l><r>jen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>joch</l><r>jen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jochst</l><r>jen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jocht</l><r>jen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jogge</l><r>jen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>each</l><r>jen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eachst</l><r>jen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>each</l><r>jen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eagen</l><r>jen<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>joch</l><r>jen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ite__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ite</l><r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ite</l><r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iten</l><r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>itend</l><r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>itende</l><r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>yt</l><r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ytst</l><r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yt</l><r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ite</l><r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>iet</l><r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ietst</l><r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iet</l><r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ieten</l><r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>yt</l><r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="dr/inke__vblex">
      <e><p><l>inke</l><r>inke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inke</l><r>inke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inken</l><r>inke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inkend</l><r>inke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inkende</l><r>inke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ink</l><r>inke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inkst</l><r>inke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inkt</l><r>inke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inke</l><r>inke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>onk</l><r>inke<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>onkst</l><r>inke<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>onk</l><r>inke<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>onken</l><r>inke<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ink</l><r>inke<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="s/ykje__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ykje</l><r>ykje<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ykje</l><r>ykje<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ocht</l><r>ykje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ykjend</l><r>ykje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ykjende</l><r>ykje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ykje</l><r>ykje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ikest</l><r>ykje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iket</l><r>ykje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ykje</l><r>ykje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ocht</l><r>ykje<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ochtst</l><r>ykje<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ocht</l><r>ykje<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ochten</l><r>ykje<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ykje</l><r>ykje<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="f/ine__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ine</l><r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ine</l><r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ûn</l><r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inend</l><r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inende</l><r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>yn</l><r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ynst</l><r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ynt</l><r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ine</l><r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ûn</l><r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ûnst</l><r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ûn</l><r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ûnen</l><r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>yn</l><r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="wi/tte__vblex">
      <e><p><l>tte</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tte</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tten</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ttend</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ttende</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>t</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tst</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tte</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>st</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>st</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>st</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sten</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>t</l><r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="sjen"><i>s</i><par n="s/jen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="besjen"><i>bes</i><par n="s/jen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="witte"><i>wi</i><par n="wi/tte__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="drinke"><i>dr</i><par n="dr/inke__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fine"><i>f</i><par n="f/ine__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sykje"><i>s</i><par n="s/ykje__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="besykje"><i>bes</i><par n="s/ykje__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ite"><i></i><par n="/ite__vblex"/></e>
